
DI28U−14

DI−24
−DIAGNOSTICS ANTI−LOCKBRAKESYSTEM

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM793E)

DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART
NOTICE:
When removing the part, turn the ignition switch OFF.
HINT:
S UsingSST09843 −18020or09843 −18040,connect the terminalsTcandE

1
ofcheckconnectororTc

and CG of DLC3, and remove the short pin.
S If anyabnormality isnot foundwhen inspectingparts, inspect theECU.
S If amalfunctioncode isdisplayedduring theDTCcheck,check thecircuit listed for thatcode.Forde-

tails of each code, turn to the page referred to under the ”See page” for respective ”DTC No.” in the
DTC chart.

DTC No.
(See Page)

Detection Item Trouble Area

C0278 / 11
( � )

Open or short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit
SABSsolenoid rela y

C0279 / 12
( � )

B+ short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit

SABS solenoid relay
SABSsolenoid relaycircuit

C0226 /2 1
( � )

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SFRcircuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSFRRorSFRHcircuit

C0236 /22
( � )

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SFLcircuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSFLRorSFLHcircuit

C0246 /23
( � )

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SRRcircuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSRHorSRRcircuit

C1225 /25
( � )

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SA1 circuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSA1 circuit

C1226 /26
( � )

Openorshort circuit inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit
(SA2circuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSA2circuit

C0200 /3 1*
1

( � )
Right front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction

C0205 /32*
1

( � )
Left front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction SRight front, left front, right rearand left rearspeedsensor

E h d i i t
C0210 /33*

1

( � )
Right rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction

SEachspeedsensorcircuit
SSensor rotor

C0215 /34*
1

( � )
Left rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction

C1237 /37
( � )

Some tire is different size from the other tires Tire size

C1241 / 41
( � )

Lowbatteryvoltageoropencircuit in IG 1 circuit
SBattery
SChargingsystem
SPowersourcecircuit

C1242 /42
*2

( � )
Open circuit in IG2 circuit

SBattery
SChargingsystem
SPowersourcecircuit

C1243 /43
( � )

Malfunction in deceleration sensor (constant output)
SDecelerationsensor
SWireharness fordecelerationsensorsystem

C1244 /44
( � )

Open or short circuit in deceleration sensor circuit
SDecelerationsensor
SDecelerationsensorcircuit

C1245 /45
( � )

Malfunction in deceleration sensor
SDecelerationsensor
SWireharness fordecelerationsensorsystem

C1248 /48
( � )

SOpenorshort circuit in reardifferential lockcircuit
SReardifferential is locking

SReardifferential lock
SReardifferential lockcircuit



ECU

Power souce*

Hydraulic brake booster

Motor relay circuit

Accumulator malfunction

Pump motor circuit

Pressure switch PH

PL

Pump motor

MTT wire harness

MT+ wire harness
MT− wire harness

MR1 open circuit

MR2 open circuit

MR1 welded contact

MR2 welded contact

Pressure leaks

IG2 open circuit

Power supply circuit

Light Buzzer Light Light Light Light Light LightBuzzer Buzzer Buzzer Buzzer Buzzer Buzzer

DTC

BRAKE warning light and buzzer

C1242/42

*: When IG1 circuit is open, ABS warning light and BRAKE warning light come on.
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C1251/51 C1252/52 C1253/53 C1254/54 C1256/56 C1257/57

−DIAGNOSTICS ANTI−LOCK BRAKE SYSTEM
DI−25

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM793E)

C1249 / 49
( � )

Open circuit in stop light switch circuit
S Stop light bulb
S Stop light switch circuit

C1251 / 51*
2

( � )
S Pump motor is locked
S Open circuit in pump motor ground

Hydraulic brake booster pump motor

C1252 / 52*
2

( � )
Hydraulic brake booster pump motor malfunction

S Hydraulic brake booster pump motor
S Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit
S Pressure switch (PH or PL)

C1253 / 53*
2

( � )
Hydraulic brake booster pump motor relay malfunction

S ABS motor relay
S ABS motor relay circuit
S Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit

C1254 / 54*
2

( � )
Pressure switch malfunction

S Pressure switch (PH or PL)
S Pressure switch circuit

C1256 / 56*
2

( � )
Accumulator low pressure malfunction

S Accumulator
S Pressure switch (PH or PL)
S Hydraulic brake booster pump motor

C1257 / 57*
2

( � )
Power supply drive circuit malfunction

S Battery
S Power Source circuit
S ABS ECU

Always ON
( � )

Malfunction in ABS ECU

S Battery
S Charging system
S Power source circuit
SABSECU

� :ReferLANDCRUISERChassisandBodyRepairManual (Pub.No.RM6 16E).
S *

1
:As theDTCcannotbeerasedby replacingpartsalonedoeitherof the followingoperations.

(1) Clear the DTC (See page DI−1 7) .
(2)At thevehiclespeedof20km/h ( 12mph),drive thevehicle for30sec.ormore.

S *
2
: Using the following table, troubled parts can be specified.


